Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4854
Ancillary summary proceedings.

The director may institute proceedings under sections 44-4809 to 44-4811 at the request of the director, commissioner, or equivalent official of the domiciliary state of any foreign or alien insurer having property located in this state.

Laws 1989, LB 319, § 54;

Laws 1990, LB 984, § 9.